Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 26

Construction And Operation

28-26-101. Construction of will.

The court in which a will is probated or to which the administration proceeding may have been transferred shall have jurisdiction to construe it at any time during the administration.

The construction may be made on the petition of the personal representative or of any other person interested in the will, or if a construction of the will is necessary to the determination of an issue properly before the court, the court may construe the will in connection with the determination of the issue.

When a petition for the construction of a will is filed, notice of the hearing shall be given to persons interested in the construction of the will.

Where a will bequeathed money to five grandchildren, children of his predeceased daughter, the six children of the daughter took as a class, as the testator expressed his intention to include all the children of his daughter and the number “five” was disregarded. Walker v. Case, 211 Ark. 1091, 204 S.W.2d 543, 173 A.L.R. 1009 (1947) (decision under prior law).

There can be no such thing as a joint will to take effect upon the death of the survivor. Hershy v. Clark, 35 Ark. 17 (1879) (decision under prior law).

Where a will provided for a trust under supervision of the chancery court which assumed administration of the trust, the probate court had jurisdiction to determine whether a bequest under the will was payable, since it was concerned with administration of the estate, but it did not have jurisdiction to determine whether a petitioner had the right to rents and possession of trust lands, since that involved administration of the trust under supervision of the chancery court. Cross v. McLaren, 223 Ark. 674, 267 S.W.2d 956 (1954).

Where a widow elected to take against the will, posing the question of whether such action accelerated the vesting of the estates of the remaindermen, the probate court had jurisdiction to construe the will. Harrison v. Harrison, 234 Ark. 271, 351 S.W.2d 441 (1961).

Where testator gave his wife a life interest in his real property with the remainder in his children, with the condition she could sell the property as necessary to be maintained and supported in the standard of living to which she was accustomed, she had the right to sell the real property to obtain sufficient funds to continue that standard, assuming she first gave the testator's children the option to purchase the property, as also required by the will. Green v. Ware, 305 Ark. 224, 807 S.W.2d 24 (1991).

Where testator devised his residuary estate to his widow “in fee simple forever” and in the next sentence of his will attempted to provide for the distribution of any other property that the widow had not disposed of during her lifetime or by her will, the limitation over was void, being inconsistent with the fee simple devise to the widow, but even so the court was not called upon to determine the validity of the latter paragraph, for a decision of that issue was not essential to a distribution of the estate, the distribution order contemplating the conclusive settlement in adversary proceeding, and the only issue that could be determined upon the filing of the final account was a proper physical distribution; even if the latter paragraph had been valid, it could not have been known at that time what property would be left undisposed of or what persons would then prove to be heirs later on. Therefore, the widow correctly interpreted the law in stating that she was the sole beneficiary of the estate. Collie v. Tucker, 229 Ark. 606, 317 S.W.2d 137 (1958).

A co-executor cannot request a construction of the will solely in his capacity as an executor because his status as a fiduciary is wholly dependent upon his position as co-executor, and, as such, he would not be an “interested person” as used in this section. Dunklin v. Ramsay, 328 Ark. 263, 944 S.W.2d 76 (1997).

Where statute provides that testator may devise realty and all his interest therein, he thus may also devise his possibility of reverter. Fletcher v. Ferrill, 216 Ark. 583, 227 S.W.2d 448, 16 A.L.R.2d 1240 (1950) (decision under prior law).

Where a deed reserved a life estate in grantor and contained reverter clause “to the heirs of the said” grantor, these words were words of limitation and not of purchase; therefore, upon lapse of condition after death of grantor, the real estate reverted to the estate of the grantor, to be distributed according to the will. Fletcher v. Ferrill, 216 Ark. 583, 227 S.W.2d 448, 16 A.L.R.2d 1240 (1950) (decision under prior law).

A clause added by third person may be disregarded. Musgrove v. Holt, 153 Ark. 355, 240 S.W. 1068 (1922) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Dickerson v. Union Nat'l Bank, 268 Ark. 292, 595 S.W.2d 677 (1980).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 32; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-416.

28-26-102. After-acquired property.

Property acquired by the testator after the making of the testator's will shall pass as if title to the property was vested in the testator at the time of making the will, unless the contrary intention manifestly appears in the will.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-409.

28-26-103. Partial intestacy.

If part but not all of the estate of a decedent is validly disposed of by will, the part not disposed of by will shall be distributed as provided by law with respect to the estates of intestates.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-411.

28-26-104. Failure of a testamentary provision.

Unless a contrary intent is indicated by the terms of the will, the following rules shall apply:

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this section:

If a devise other than a residuary devise fails for any reason, it becomes a part of the residue; and

If the residue is devised to two (2) or more persons and the share of one (1) of the residuary devisees fails for any reason, his or her share passes to the other residuary devisee, or to other residuary devisees in proportion to their interests in the residue; and

Whenever property is devised to a child, natural or adopted, or other descendant of the testator, either by specific provision or as a member of a class, and the devisee shall die in the lifetime of the testator, leaving a child, natural or adopted, or other descendant who survives the testator, the devise shall not lapse, but the property shall vest in the surviving child or other descendant of the devisee, as if the devisee had survived the testator and died intestate.

Ark. L. Rev.

Descent in Absence of Kin — Escheat, 13 Ark. L. Rev. 350.

The Doctrine of Worthier Title in Arkansas, 21 Ark. L. Rev. 394.

The New Arkansas Inheritance Laws: A Step into the Present with an Eye to the Future, 23 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

Case Note, Cox v. Whitten: Limiting the Inheritance Rights of Adopted Adults, etc., 40 Ark. L. Rev. 627.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Jans, Survey of Decedents' Estates, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 216.

Survey of Arkansas Law, Decedents' Estates, 5 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 135.

Adopted children of predeceased legatee were held to be within statutory provisions. Dean v. Smith, 195 Ark. 614, 113 S.W.2d 485 (1938) (decision under prior law).

A legacy or devise lapses when the legatee or devisee dies before the testator with the exception of where the legacy or devise is to the child or other descendant of the testator. Christy v. Smith, 226 Ark. 289, 289 S.W.2d 885 (1956).

Where the legatee or devisee dies before the testator, the legacy or devise lapses unless the beneficiary is a child or other descendant of the testator or where it is a gift to a class. Scholem v. Long, 246 Ark. 786, 439 S.W.2d 929 (1969).

Where the residuary clause of the will of a testator left all property to a brother who survived testator and to a sister who predeceased testator, the bequest of one-half of the residuum to the sister lapsed and the bequest passed as intestate property to be distributed to the heirs-at-law of the testator. Eckert Heirs v. Harlow, 251 Ark. 1018, 476 S.W.2d 244 (1972).

Circuit court erred in ruling that the interests of beneficiaries who predeceased the surviving settlor of an inter vivos trust lapsed upon the death of the beneficiaries; rather, the beneficiaries'descendants were entitled to the beneficiaries'shares of the trust distribution upon the settlor's death.Tait v. Community First Trust Co., 2012 Ark. 455, 425 S.W.3d 684 (2012).

A devise of land to three cousins of testator who were described by name and not by relationship was a distributive gift to individuals rather than a gift to a class, and the gift lapsed as to one of the cousins when his death preceded the death of the testator, notwithstanding a clause in the will providing that the devisees were not to sell or mortgage the property for 20 years after death of testator. Scholem v. Long, 246 Ark. 786, 439 S.W.2d 929 (1969).

A legacy or devise to one not a descendant of the testator lapses when the legatee or devisee dies before the testator and becomes part of the residuary estate passing under the clause of the will disposing of the residuum. Gibbons v. Ward, 115 Ark. 184, 171 S.W. 90 (1914) (decision under prior law).

A devise to A for life, with remainder to B, does not lapse by the death of A in the lifetime of the testator, but vests immediately in B on the death of the testator. West v. Williams, 15 Ark. 682 (1855) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Welch v. Tarver, 256 Ark. 272, 507 S.W.2d 505 (1974); Jones v. Bransford, 270 Ark. 664, 606 S.W.2d 118 (Ct. App. 1980).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 26; 1979, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-410.

28-26-105. Devise of encumbered property.

A valid charge or encumbrance upon any property shall not revoke any provision of a previously executed will relating to the same property. However, the devisee shall take the property subject to the charge or encumbrance, the discharge of which will be governed by the provisions of §28-53-113.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 29; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-413.